Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2298.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Stun gun." A device that is designed to emit an electronic, magnetic or other type of charge to temporarily immobilize or incapacitate.* * *Section 2. Section 901(b.2), (b.3), (b.4) and (b.5) of the act are amended to read:Section 901. Enforcement of this act by the secretary; provisions for inspections.* * *(b.2) Limitation on the possession of firearms and stun guns.--No dog warden or employee of the department shall carry, possess or use a firearm or stun gun in the performance of duties[.] unless the person has the approval of the secretary and holds a current and valid certification in the use and handling of firearms or stun guns under at least one of the following:(1) The act of October 10, 1974 (P.L.705, No.235), known as the Lethal Weapons Training Act.(2) 44 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 Subch. C (relating to sheriff and deputy sheriff education and training).(3) 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).(4) A firearm or stun gun training program which has been determined by the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police to be of sufficient scope and duration to provide the participant with basic training in the use and handling of firearms or stun guns. A training program under this 20260HB2298PN3011 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph may be provided by the department for dog wardens.(b.3) Application of section to prior dog wardens.--(1) Any dog warden or employee of the department who, prior to the effective date of this act, has successfully completed a training program similar to that required under subsection (b.1) shall, after review by the secretary, be certified as having met the training requirements of this act. Any dog warden or employee of the department who, prior to the effective date of this act, has not successfully completed a training program similar to that required under subsection (b.1) may continue to perform the duties of a dog warden until the person has successfully completed the required training program, but not longer than two years from the effective date of this act.(2) (Reserved).(3) A dog warden or employee of the department who, prior to the effective date of this paragraph, has not received approval of the secretary and not been certified in the use and handling of firearms or stun guns under one or more of the statutes under subsection (b.2)(1), (2) or (3) or a program under subsection (b.2)(4), may not carry or possess a firearm or stun gun in the performance of the duties of a dog warden until the person has, under subsection (b.2), received approval of the secretary and been certified in the use and handling of firearms or stun guns.(b.4) Refusal, suspension or revocation authorized.--The department may refuse to employ a person to act as a dog warden or may suspend or revoke the employment of a person who is acting as a dog warden if the department determines that the person has:20260HB2298PN3011 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Failed to satisfy the training requirements of subsection (b.1) or (b.2).(2) Had a criminal history record which would disqualify the applicant from becoming a law enforcement officer.(3) Been convicted of violating 18 Pa.C.S. § 5301 (relating to official oppression).(b.5) Additional grounds.--The department may refuse to employ a person to act as a dog warden or other employee charged with the enforcement of this act or may suspend or revoke the employment of a person who is acting as a dog warden or is charged with the enforcement of this act if the department determines that the person has:(1) Made a false or misleading statement in the application for employment.(2) Carried or possessed a firearm or stun gun in the performance of his or her duties without permission and certification pursuant to subsection (b.2).(3) Engaged in conduct which constitutes a prima facie violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5301 or Ch. 55 (relating to riot, disorderly conduct and related offenses).(4) Knowingly failed to enforce any of the provisions of this act.(5) Violated any of the provisions of this act.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2298PN3011 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425